Washington statutes.
RCW 11.125.420

Death with dignity act.

Notwithstanding any provision in chapter 209, Laws of 2016, or any provision in a power of attorney, no rights under Washington's death with dignity act, chapter 70.245 RCW, may be exercised through a power of attorney.

[ 2016 c 209 s 219.]